Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 5. Prohibited Practices; Penalties

§ 141.
Fraud.

A person who knowingly fails, by false statement, misrepresentation, impersonation, or other fraudulent means, to disclose a material fact used to determine whether that person is qualified to receive aid or benefits under a State or federally funded assistance program; or who knowingly fails to disclose a change in circumstances in order to obtain or continue to receive aid or benefits to which he or she is not entitled or in an amount larger than that to which he or she is entitled; or who knowingly aids and abets another person in the commission of any such act shall be punished as provided in section 143 of this title.

A person who knowingly uses, transfers, acquires, traffics, alters, forges, or possesses; or who knowingly attempts to use, transfer, acquire, traffic, alter, forge, or possess; or who knowingly aids and abets another person in the use, transfer, acquisition, traffic, alteration, forgery, or possession of a Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefit card, authorization for the purchase of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits, certificate of eligibility for medical services, or State health care program identification card in a manner not authorized by law shall be punished as provided in section 143 of this title.

A person who administers a State or federally funded assistance program who fraudulently misappropriates, attempts to misappropriate, or aids and abets in the misappropriation of a Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefit, authorization for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits, a Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefit identification card, certificate of eligibility for prescribed medicine, State health care program identification card, or assistance from any other State or federally funded program with which he or she has been entrusted or of which he or she has gained possession by virtue of his or her position; or who knowingly misappropriates, attempts to misappropriate, or aids or abets in the misappropriation of funds given in exchange for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits shall be punished as provided in section 143 of this title.

A person who knowingly files, attempts to file, or aids and abets in the filing of a claim for services to a recipient of benefits under a State or federally funded assistance program for services that were not rendered; or who knowingly files a false claim or a claim for unauthorized items or services under such a program; or who knowingly bills the recipient of benefits under such a program or his or her family for an amount in excess of that provided for by law or regulation; or who knowingly fails to credit the State or its agent for payments received from Social Security, insurance, or other sources; or who in any way knowingly receives, attempts to receive, or aids and abets in the receipt of unauthorized payment as provided herein shall be punished as provided in section 143 of this title.

A person providing service for which compensation is paid under a State or federally funded assistance program who requests, and receives, either actually or constructively, any payment or contribution through a payment, assessment, gift, devise, bequest, or other means, whether directly or indirectly, from either a recipient of assistance from the assistance program or from the family of the recipient shall notify the Commissioner for Children and Families or the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access, on a form provided by him or her, of the amount of the payment or contribution and of such other information as specified by the Commissioner for Children and Families or the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access within 10 days after the receipt of the payment or contribution or, if the payment or contribution is to become effective at some time in the future, within 10 days of the consummation of the agreement to make the payment or contribution. Failure to notify the Commissioner for Children and Families or the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access within the time prescribed is punishable as provided in section 143 of this title.

Repayment of assistance or services wrongfully obtained shall not constitute a defense to or ground for dismissal of criminal charges brought under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 1; amended

1973, No. 49

;

1977, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 74;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.40;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 142.
Bringing needy person into the State.

Any person who knowingly brings or causes to be brought a needy person from out of the state into this State for the purpose of securing assistance for the needy person or making him or her a public charge, shall be obligated to support the needy person at his or her own expense as long as the needy person or persons dependent on the needy person remain in the State.

The Commissioner may bring a civil action on this statute to enforce support of the needy person and his or her dependents. In the action, the court may make an order, which shall be subject to change by the court from time to time as the circumstances require, directing the defendant to pay a certain sum periodically to the Department for the benefit of the needy person and his or her dependents residing in the State. The court may punish for violation of the order as for contempt.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 1.

§ 143.
General penalty.

A person who knowingly violates a provision of this title for which no penalty is specifically provided shall:

if the assistance or benefits obtained pursuant to a single fraudulent scheme or a course of conduct are in violation of subsection 141(a) or (b) of this title involving $1,000.00 or less, be fined not more than the amount of assistance or benefits wrongfully obtained or be imprisoned not more than one year, or both;

if the assistance or benefits obtained pursuant to a single fraudulent scheme or course of conduct are in violation of subsection (a) or (b) of section 141 of this title and involve more than $1,000.00, be fined not more than an amount equal to the assistance or benefits wrongfully obtained or be imprisoned not more than three years, or both; or

if the violation is under subsection (c), (d), or (e) of section 141 of this title, be fined up to $1,000.00 or up to an amount equal to twice the amount of assistance, benefits, or payments wrongfully obtained, or be imprisoned for not more than 10 years, or both.

If the person convicted is receiving assistance, benefits, or payments, the Commissioner for Children and Families or the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access may recoup the amount of assistance or benefits wrongfully obtained by reducing the assistance, benefits, or payments periodically paid to the recipient, as limited by federal law, until the amount is fully recovered.

If a provider of services is convicted of a violation of subsection 141(d) or (e) of this title, the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access shall, within 90 days of the conviction, suspend the provider from further participation in the medical assistance program administered under Title XIX of the Social Security Act for a period of four years. The suspension required by this subsection may be waived by the Secretary of Human Services only upon a finding that the recipients served by the convicted provider would suffer substantial hardship through a denial of medical services that could not reasonably be obtained through another provider.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 1; amended

1977, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 75;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.41;

2021, No. 20

, § 275.

§ 143a.
Civil remedies.

A person who violates subsection 141(c), (d), or (e) of this title with actual knowledge may be subject to a civil suit by the Attorney General for:

restitution of the amount of assistance, benefits, or payments wrongfully obtained;

interest; and

a civil penalty of up to three times the amount of the wrongfully obtained assistance, benefits, or payments; or $500.00 per false claim; or $500.00 for each false document submitted in support of a false claim, whichever is greatest.

The remedies provided in this section shall be in addition to any other remedies provided by law.

The right to a jury trial shall attach to actions under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 143b.
Education and information.

By January 1, 2005, the Department of Vermont Health Access shall issue rules establishing a procedure for health care providers enrolled in State and federally funded medical assistance programs to obtain advisory opinions regarding coverage and reimbursement under those programs. Each advisory opinion issued by the Department of Vermont Health Access shall be binding on that Department and the party or parties requesting the opinion only with regard to the specific questions posed in the opinion, the facts and information set forth in it, and the statutes and rules specifically noted in the opinion.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 76;

2009, No. 33

, § 65;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.42.

§ 144.
Statutory construction.

Section 143 of this title shall not preclude prosecution under

13 V.S.A. § 1801

, 1802, or 2002 when the alleged violation involves forging an economic assistance check or where duplicate economic assistance checks have been wrongfully negotiated during any one welfare period.

Section 143 of this title shall not preclude prosecution under any other title or sections of this title when the alleged violation is under subsection 141(c) or (d) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 276.